Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 19
FRATERNITIES — RESTRICTIONS

Section.

33-1901. Fraternities, sororities, and secret societies prohibited in elementary and secondary schools. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

33-1902. Fraternity, sorority or secret society defined

Exceptions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

33-1903. Enforcement. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.